Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
577A

LEGAL
CAPACITY OF MINOR REGARDING MEDICAL CARE]

Section

577A-1 Definitions

577A-2 Consent valid

577A-3 Providing information

577A-4 Financial responsibility; counseling

577A-5 Limitation of actions

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next